Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-375
Operation of vehicle without registration;
finance company; repossession plates; fee.

(1) A finance
company which is licensed to do business in this state may, in lieu of registering
each motor vehicle or trailer repossessed, upon the payment of a fee of ten
dollars, make an application to the department for a repossession registration
certificate and one repossession license plate. Additional pairs of repossession
certificates and repossession license plates may be procured for a fee of
ten dollars each. Repossession license plates may be used only for operating
or towing motor vehicles or trailers on the highways for the purpose of repossession,
demonstration, and disposal of such motor vehicles or trailers. The repossession
certificate shall be displayed on demand for any motor vehicle or trailer
which has a repossession license plate. A finance company shall be entitled
to a dealer license plate only in the event such company is licensed as a
motor vehicle dealer or trailer dealer under the
Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act.

(2) Repossession license plates shall be prefixed with a large letter
R and be serially numbered from 1 to distinguish them from each other. Such
license plates shall be displayed only on the rear of a repossessed motor
vehicle or trailer.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 75;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 8.

Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, see section 60-1401.